Utah statutes.
35A-1-104.   Department authority.

Within all other authority or responsibility granted to it by law, the department may:

(1)  adopt rules when authorized by this title, in accordance with the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(2)  purchase, as authorized or required by law, services that the department is responsible to provide for legally eligible persons;

(3)  conduct adjudicative proceedings in accordance with the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(4)  establish eligibility standards for its programs, not inconsistent with state or federal law or regulations;

(5)  take necessary steps, including legal action, to recover money or the monetary value of services provided to a recipient who is not eligible;

(6)  administer oaths, certify to official acts, issue subpoenas to compel witnesses and the production of books, accounts, documents, and other records necessary as evidence;

(7)  acquire, manage, and dispose of any real or personal property needed or owned by the department, not inconsistent with state law;

(8)  receive gifts, grants, devises, and donations or their proceeds, crediting the program designated by the donor, and using the gift, grant, devise, or donation for the purposes requested by the donor, as long as the request conforms to state and federal policy;

(9)  accept and employ volunteer labor or services;

(10)  reimburse volunteers for necessary expenses, when the department considers that reimbursement to be appropriate;

(11)  carry out the responsibility assigned by the State Workforce Services Plan developed by the State Council on Workforce Services;

(12)  provide training and educational opportunities for its staff;

(13)  examine and audit the expenditures of any public funds provided to a local authority, agency, or organization that contracts with or receives funds from those authorities or agencies;

(14)  accept and administer grants from the federal government and from other sources, public or private;

(15)  employ and determine the compensation of clerical, legal, technical, investigative, and other employees necessary to carry out its policymaking, regulatory, and enforcement powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities under this title;

(16)  establish and conduct free employment agencies, and bring together employers seeking employees and working people seeking employment, and make known the opportunities for employment in this state;

(17)  collect, collate, and publish statistical and other information relating to employees, employers, employments, and places of employment, and other statistics as it considers proper;

(18)  encourage the expansion and use of apprenticeship programs meeting state or federal standards for apprenticeship programs;

(19)  develop processes to ensure that the department responds to the full range of employee and employer clients; and

(20)  carry out the responsibilities assigned to it by statute.

